Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 8 Diversion Center and Program

42-8-130.
[Repealed] Establishment; obligations of respondent; confinement; fee; alternative methods of incarceration.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-130

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 649, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-79, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 repeal of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).